Colorado statutes. TITLE 25.5 Health Care Policy and Financing
PART 1
GENERAL PROVISIONS

25.5-1-101. Short title.

This title shall be known and may be cited as the "State Health Care Policy and Financing Act".

Source:

L. 93:

Entire title added, p. 1097, § 15, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 2006:

Entire part amended, p. 1781, § 1, effective July 1.

25.5-1-102. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly declares that state and local policymakers and health and human services administrators recognize that the management of and the delivery system for health and human services have become complex, fragmented, and costly and that the health and human services delivery system in this state should be restructured to adequately address the needs of Colorado citizens.

The general assembly further finds and declares that a continuing budget crisis makes it unlikely that funding sources will keep pace with the increasing demands of health and human services.

Therefore, the general assembly finds that it is appropriate to restructure principal departments responsible for overseeing the delivery of health and human services and to reform the state's health and human services administration and delivery system, using guiding principles and within the time frames set forth in article 1.7 of title 24, C.R.S., as said article existed prior to July 1, 1997. It is the general assembly's intent that the departments of public health and environment, health care policy and financing, and human services be operational, effective July 1, 1994.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire title added, p. 1097, § 15, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 2006:

Entire part amended, p. 1781, § 1, effective July 1.

25.5-1-103. Definitions.

As used in this title 25.5, unless the context otherwise requires:

"County board" means the county or district board of human or social services; except that, in the city and county of Denver, "county board" means the department or agency with the responsibility for public assistance and welfare activities, and, in the city and county of Broomfield, "county board" means the city council or a board or commission with the responsibility for public assistance and welfare activities appointed by the city and county of Broomfield.

"County department" means the county or district department of human or social services.

"County director" means the director of the county or district department of human or social services.

"Executive director" means the executive director of the department of health care policy and financing.

"Medical assistance" means any program administered by the state department, including but not limited to the "Colorado Medical Assistance Act", as specified in articles 4, 5, and 6 of this title, the "Children's Basic Health Plan Act", article 8 of this title, the old age pension health and medical care program, and the supplemental old age pension health and medical care program; except that "medical assistance" for purposes of articles 4, 5, and 6 of this title shall have the meaning as defined in section 25.5-4-103 (13).

(5.5) "Medical home" means an appropriately qualified medical specialty, developmental, therapeutic, or mental health-care practice that verifiably ensures continuous, accessible, and comprehensive access to and coordination of community-based medical care, mental health care, oral health care, and related services for a child. A medical home may also be referred to as a health-care home. If a child's medical home is not a primary medical care provider, the child must have a primary medical care provider to ensure that a child's primary medical care needs are appropriately addressed. All medical homes shall ensure, at a minimum, the following:

Health maintenance and preventive care;

Anticipatory guidance and health education;

Acute and chronic illness care;

Coordination of medications, specialists, and therapies;

Provider participation in hospital care; and

Twenty-four-hour telephone care.

"Recipient" means any person who has been determined eligible to receive benefits or services under this title.

"State board" or "board" means the medical services board created pursuant to section 25.5-1-301.

"State department" means the department of health care policy and financing.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (9) is effective until July 1, 2024.] "State designated agency" means an agency designated to perform specified functions that would otherwise be performed by the county departments, including the single entry point agencies and medical assistance sites.

(9)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (9) is effective July 1, 2024.

]

"State designated agency" means an agency designated to perform specified functions that would otherwise be performed by the county departments, including case management agencies, as defined in section 25.5-6-1702, and medical assistance sites.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire title added, p. 1098, § 15, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 95:

(2.5) added, p. 903, § 2, effective May 25.

L. 96:

(1) repealed, p. 1473, § 25, effective June 1.

L. 2006:

Entire part amended, p. 1782, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(5.5) added, p. 1487, § 1, effective May 31.

L. 2018:

IP and (1) to (3) amended, (SB 18-092), ch. 38, p. 443, § 106, effective August 8.

L. 2021:

(9) amended, (HB 21-1187), ch. 83, p. 331, § 21, effective July 1, 2024.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 18-092, see section 1 of chapter 38, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

25.5-1-104. Department of health care policy and financing created - executive director - powers, duties, and functions.

There is hereby created the department of health care policy and financing, the head of which shall be the executive director of the department of health care policy and financing, which office is hereby created. The executive director shall be appointed by the governor, with the consent of the senate, and shall serve at the pleasure of the governor. The reappointment of an executive director after an initial election of a governor shall be subject to the provisions of section 24-20-109, C.R.S. The executive director has those powers, duties, and functions prescribed for the heads of principal departments in the "Administrative Organization Act of 1968", article 1 of title 24, C.R.S., and any powers, duties, and functions set forth in this title.

The department of health care policy and financing shall consist of an executive director of the department of health care policy and financing, the medical services board, and such divisions, sections, and other units as shall be established by the executive director pursuant to the provisions of subsection (3) of this section.

The executive director may establish such divisions, sections, and other units within the state department as are necessary for the proper and efficient discharge of the powers, duties, and functions of the state department; except that such action by the executive director shall not conflict with the implementation requirements for the plan for restructuring the delivery of health and human services in this state, as set forth in article 1.7 of title 24, C.R.S.

The department of health care policy and financing shall be responsible for the administration of the functions and programs as set forth in this title.

The executive director of the state department shall appoint an internal auditor who shall have the status of a division director and, as such, shall have the authority to appoint such personnel as may be necessary to carry out the duties of the internal auditor.

The internal auditor appointed by the executive director pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (5) shall:

Conduct and supervise internal audits of the state department;

Coordinate and facilitate external audits that are performed on the state department by state and federal entities;

Conduct and supervise performance audits for the purpose of determining the efficiency and effectiveness of the state department's operation and administration of programs; and

Conduct such other audits and perform such other duties as may be specified by the executive director.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire title added, p. 1098, § 15, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 94:

(2) amended, p. 1559, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(2) amended, p. 1474, § 26, effective June 1.

L. 2006:

Entire part amended, p. 1783, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

(5) added, (SB 10-167), ch. 296, p. 1376, § 2, effective May 26.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 10-167, see section 1 of chapter 296, Session Laws of Colorado 2010.

25.5-1-105. Transfer of functions.

The state department shall, on and after July 1, 1994, execute, administer, perform, and enforce the rights, powers, duties, functions, and obligations vested prior to July 1, 1994, in the Colorado health data commission within the department of local affairs, the department of social services concerning the "Colorado Medical Assistance Act", and the university of Colorado health sciences center concerning health care for the medically indigent.

All rules, regulations, and orders of the department of local affairs, the state department of social services, the state board of social services, the department of regulatory agencies, and the university of Colorado health sciences center adopted prior to July 1, 1994, in connection with the powers, duties, and functions transferred to the state department shall continue to be effective until revised, amended, repealed, or nullified pursuant to law. On and after July 1, 1994, the state board or the executive director, whichever is appropriate, shall adopt rules necessary for the administration of the state department and the administration of the programs set forth in this title.

No suit, action, or other judicial or administrative proceeding lawfully commenced prior to July 1, 1994, or which could have been commenced prior to such date, by or against the department of local affairs, the state department of social services, the department of regulatory agencies, or the university of Colorado health sciences center, or any officer thereof in such officer's official capacity or in relation to the discharge of the official's duties, shall abate by reason of the transfer of duties and functions from said departments to the state department.

The executive director, or a designee of the executive director, may accept, on behalf of and in the name of the state, gifts, donations, and grants for any purpose connected with the work and programs of the state department. Any property so given shall be held by the state treasurer, but the executive director, or the designee therefor, shall have the power to direct the disposition of any property so given for any purpose consistent with the terms and conditions under which such gift was created.

The revisor of statutes is hereby authorized to change all references in the Colorado Revised Statutes to the department of local affairs, the state department of social services, the department of regulatory agencies, and the university of Colorado health sciences center from said references to the state department, as appropriate and with respect to the powers, duties, and functions transferred to the state department. In connection with such authority, the revisor of statutes is hereby authorized to amend or delete provisions of the Colorado Revised Statutes so as to make the statutes consistent with the powers, duties, and functions transferred pursuant to this section.

On and after July 1, 2003, the powers, duties, and functions relating to the old age pension health and medical care program, as specified in section 25.5-2-101, are transferred by a type 2 transfer to the department of health care policy and financing.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire title added, p. 1099, § 15, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 94:

(2) amended, p. 2610, § 12, effective July 1; (6) amended, p. 1559, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(10) added, p. 2583, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

(1) amended, p. 772, § 50, effective June 1.

L. 2006:

Entire part amended, p. 1783, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2011:

(6) amended, (SB 11-210), ch. 187, p. 721, § 6, effective July 15, 2012.

25.5-1-105.5. Chief medical officer - qualifications.

The executive director shall appoint a chief medical officer who shall:

Have a degree of doctor of medicine or doctor of osteopathy and be licensed to practice medicine in the state of Colorado;

Have at least two years of postgraduate experience in primary care; and

Have at least two years of experience in an administrative capacity in a health-care organization.

The chief medical officer shall, with the assistance of advisory committees of the state department, provide medical judgment and advice regarding all medical issues involving programs administered by the state department.

The chief medical officer shall receive a salary within the limits of moneys made available to the state department by appropriation of the general assembly or otherwise.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire section added, p. 1492, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

(1) amended and (3) added, (SB 10-167), ch. 296, p. 1377, § 3, effective May 26.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2007 act enacting this section, see section 1 of chapter 347, Session Laws of Colorado 2007. For the legislative declaration in SB 10-167, see section 1 of chapter 296, Session Laws of Colorado 2010.

25.5-1-106. Restructure of health and human services - development of plan - participation of department required. (Deleted by amendment)

Source:

L. 93:

Entire title added, p. 1101, § 15, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 2006:

Entire part amended, p. 1785, § 1, effective July 1.

25.5-1-107. Final agency action - administrative law judge - authority of executive director.

The executive director may appoint one or more persons to serve as administrative law judges for the state department pursuant to section 24-4-105 and pursuant to part 10 of article 30 of title 24 subject to appropriations made to the department of personnel. Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, hearings conducted by the administrative law judge are considered initial decisions of the state department and shall be reviewed by the executive director or a designee of the executive director. In the event exceptions to the initial decision are filed pursuant to section 24-4-105 (14)(a)(I), the review must be in accordance with section 24-4-105 (15). In the absence of any exception filed pursuant to section 24-4-105 (14)(a)(I), the executive director shall review the initial decision in accordance with a procedure adopted by the state board. The procedure must be consistent with federal mandates concerning the single state agency requirement. Review by the executive director in accordance with section 24-4-105 (15) or the procedure adopted by the state board pursuant to this section constitutes final agency action. The administrative law judge may conduct hearings on appeals from decisions of county departments of human or social services brought by recipients of and applicants for medical assistance and welfare that are required by law in order for the state to qualify for federal funds, and the administrative law judge may conduct other hearings for the state department. Notice of any such hearing must be served at least ten days prior to such hearing.

Hearings initiated by a licensed or certified provider of services shall be conducted by an administrative law judge for the state department and shall be considered final agency action and subject to judicial review in accordance with the provisions of section 24-4-106, C.R.S., for any party, including the state department, which shall be considered a person for such purposes.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire title added, p. 1101, § 15, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 95:

(1)(a) and (2) amended, p. 903, § 3, effective May 25; (1)(a) and (1)(c) amended, p. 664, § 101, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(1)(b) amended, p. 1190, § 10, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

(1)(c) amended, p. 859, § 25, effective June 1.

L. 2006:

Entire part amended, p. 1785, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2018:

(1) amended, (SB 18-092), ch. 38, p. 443, § 107, effective August 8.

Editor's note:

Amendments to subsection (1)(a) by Senate Bill 95-78 and House Bill 95-1362 were harmonized.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1995 act amending subsections (1)(a) and (1)(c), see section 112 of chapter 167, Session Laws of Colorado 1995. For the legislative declaration in SB 18-092, see section 1 of chapter 38, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

25.5-1-108. Executive director - rules.

The executive director shall have authority to promulgate rules in connection with the policies and procedures governing the administration of the department including, but not limited to, rules concerning the following:

Matters of internal administration of the department, including organization, staffing, records, reports, systems, and procedures;

Fiscal and personnel administration for the department;

Accounting and fiscal reporting policies and procedures for disbursement of federal funds, contingency funds, and distribution of available appropriations;

Such other rules relating to those functions the executive director is required to carry out pursuant to the provisions of this title.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect any specific statutory provision granting rule-making authority in relation to a specific program to the executive director.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire section added, p. 1556, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 95:

(4) amended, p.1105, § 43, effective May 31.

L. 2006:

Entire part amended, p. 1786, § 1, effective July 1.

25.5-1-109. Department of health care policy and financing cash fund.

All moneys collected by the state department as fees or otherwise shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the department of health care policy and financing cash fund, which fund is hereby created in the state treasury. Moneys in the fund shall be subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly for the direct and indirect costs of the state department's duties as provided by law.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire section added, p. 1941, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

Entire part amended, p. 1787, § 1, effective July 1.

25.5-1-109.5. Clinical standards - development.

The general assembly finds that:

It is important to collect and analyze objective clinical standards to maximize the scarce dollars available for medical care; and

The development of an ongoing, transparent measurement of health outcomes is essential to ensure quality health care for Coloradans.

The state department, following consultation with external clinical advisors, shall develop clinical standards and methods for collecting, analyzing, and disclosing information regarding clinical performance, including but not limited to immunization rates, medical home standards, clinical care guidelines, care coordination, case management, disease management, and coordination and integration of mental health services. The standards and methods shall be consistent with national guidelines and standards regarding the collection and analysis of health data, where feasible, and shall meet the federal reporting requirements established under Titles XIX and XXI of the federal "Social Security Act", 42 U.S.C. secs. 1396 and 1397.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire section added, p. 1495, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 2016:

(2)(b) repealed, (HB 16-1081), ch. 22, p. 50, § 1, effective August 10.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2007 act enacting this section, see section 1 of chapter 347, Session Laws of Colorado 2007.

25.5-1-110. Study of children's access to health care coverage - acceptance of donations - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire section added, p. 1612, § 1, effective June 7.

L. 2003:

(4) amended, p. 2009, § 89, effective May 22.

L. 2006:

Entire part amended, p. 1787, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

Subsection (6) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2005. (See L. 2002, p. 1612.)

25.5-1-111. Waiver applications - authorization. (Deleted by amendment)

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire section added, p. 1308, § 27, effective June 7.

L. 2006:

Entire part amended, p. 1787, § 1, effective July 1.

25.5-1-112. Drug-purchasing pool - report - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire section added, p. 1995, § 9, effective June 5.

L. 2006:

Entire part amended, p. 1787, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

Subsection (3) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2005. (See L. 2004, p. 1995.)

25.5-1-113. Federal authorization - repeal. (Deleted by amendment)

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire section added, p. 1230, § 9, effective June 3.

L. 2006:

Entire part amended, p. 1787, § 1, effective July 1.

25.5-1-113.5. Children's access to health care - reports. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire section added, p. 1494, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 2017:

Entire section repealed, (HB 17-1060), ch. 6, p. 14, § 1, effective March 1.

25.5-1-114. Grants-in-aid - county supervision.

The state department shall consult with and coordinate with the counties before making any changes that affect county operations in the implementation of this section, when possible under state statutes and federal statutes and regulations.

In administering any funds appropriated or made available to the state department for medical assistance administration, the state department has the power to:

Require as a condition for receiving grants-in-aid that each county in this state shall bear the proportion of the total expense of furnishing medical assistance administration as is fixed by law relating to such assistance;

Terminate any grants-in-aid to any county of this state if the laws and regulations providing such grants-in-aid and the minimum standards prescribed by rules of the state department thereunder are not complied with;

Undertake forthwith the administration of any or all medical assistance within any county of this state which has had any or all of its grants-in-aid terminated pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subsection (2); but the county shall continue to meet the requirements of paragraph (a) of this subsection (2);

Recover any moneys owed by a county to the state by reducing the amount of any payments due from the state in connection with the administration of medical assistance;

Take any other action which may be necessary or desirable for carrying out the provisions of this title.

The state department, under the supervision of the executive director, shall provide supervision of county departments for the effective administration of medical assistance as set out in the rules of the executive director and the rules of the state board pursuant to section 25.5-1-301; except that nothing in this subsection (3) shall be construed to allow counties to continue to receive an amount equal to the increased funding in the event the said funding is no longer available from the federal government.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire part amended, p. 1787, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section was contained in a 2006 act that amended this part, resulting in the addition of this section.

25.5-1-114.5. Medicaid fraud detection - request for information.

In enacting this section, the general assembly intends to:

Implement waste, fraud, and abuse detection, prevention, and recovery solutions to improve program integrity in the state's medicaid program and create efficiency and cost savings through a shift from a retrospective "pay and chase" model to a prospective prepayment model; and

Invest in the most cost-effective technologies or strategies that yield the highest return on investment.

By September 30, 2013, the state department shall issue a request for information to seek input from potential contractors on capabilities that the state department does not currently possess, functions that the state department is not currently performing, and the cost structures associated with implementing:

Advanced predictive modeling and analytics technologies to provide a comprehensive and accurate view across all providers, recipients, and geographic locations within the medicaid program in order to:

Identify and analyze those billing and utilization patterns that represent a high risk of fraudulent activity;

Be easily integrated into the existing medicaid program claims operations;

Undertake and automate such analysis before payment is made to minimize disruptions to state department operations and speed claim resolution;

Prioritize the identified transactions for additional review before payment is made based upon the likelihood of potential waste, fraud, or abuse;

Obtain outcome information from adjudicated claims to allow for refinement and enhancement of the predictive analytics technologies based on historical data and algorithms with the system; and

Prevent the payment of claims for reimbursement that have been identified as potentially wasteful, fraudulent, or abusive until the claims have been automatically verified as valid;

Provider and recipient data verification and screening technology solutions, which may use publicly available records, for the purposes of automating reviews and identifying and preventing inappropriate payments by:

Identifying associations between providers, practitioners, and beneficiaries that indicate rings of collusive fraudulent activity; and

Discovering recipient attributes that indicate improper eligibility, including but not limited to death, out-of-state residency, inappropriate asset ownership, or incarceration; and

Fraud investigation services that combine retrospective claims analysis and prospective waste, fraud, or abuse detection techniques. These services must include analysis of historical claims data, medical records, suspect provider databases, and high-risk identification lists, as well as direct recipient and provider interviews. Emphasis must be placed on the state department providing education to providers and allowing them the opportunity to review and correct any problems identified prior to administrative proceedings.

In addition to the information provided pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, a potential contractor responding to the request for information shall include information concerning:

The extent to which the potential contractor will seek clinical and technical expertise from Colorado providers concerning the design and implementation of the medicaid fraud detection system described in this section and the method or methods for seeking that expertise; and

The potential contractor's ability to create an education and outreach program that is widely available and easily accessible to Colorado providers for purposes of educating providers on issues relating to coverage and coding.

The state department is encouraged to use the results of the request for information to create formal requests for proposals to carry out the work identified in this section if the following conditions are met:

The state department expects to generate state savings by preventing fraud, waste, and abuse;

This work can be integrated into the state department's current medicaid operations without creating additional costs to the state; and

The reviews or audits are not anticipated to delay or improperly deny the payment of legitimate claims to providers.

Prior to awarding any contract pursuant to this section, the state department shall establish an appeal process for providers that minimizes the administrative burden placed on providers, limits the number of medical records requests, and provides adequate time for providers to respond to inquiries.

It is the intent of the general assembly that the savings achieved through this section must more than cover the cost of implementation and administration. Therefore, to the extent possible, technology services used in carrying out this section must be secured using the savings generated by the program, with the state's direct cost funded through the actual savings achieved.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire section added, (SB 13-137), ch. 285, p. 1501, § 1, effective August 7.

25.5-1-115. Locating violators - recoveries.

The executive director of the state department, or district attorneys may request and shall receive from departments, boards, bureaus, or other agencies of the state or any of its political subdivisions, and the same are authorized to provide, such assistance and data as will enable the state department and county departments properly to carry out their powers and duties to locate and prosecute any person who has fraudulently obtained medical assistance under this title. Any records established pursuant to the provisions of this section shall be available only to the state department, the department of human services, the county departments, the attorney general, and the district attorneys, county attorneys, and courts having jurisdiction in fraud or recovery proceedings or actions.

All departments and agencies of the state and local governments shall cooperate in the location and prosecution of any person who has fraudulently obtained medical assistance under this title, and, on request of the county board, the county director, the state department, or the district attorney of any judicial district in this state, shall supply all information on hand relative to the location, employment, income, and property of such persons, notwithstanding any other provision of law making such information confidential, except the laws pertaining to confidentiality of any tax returns filed pursuant to law with the department of revenue. The department of revenue shall furnish at no cost to inquiring departments and agencies such information as may be necessary to effectuate the purposes of this article. The procedures whereby this information will be requested and provided shall be established by rule of the state department. The state department or county departments shall use such information only for the purposes of administering medical assistance under this title, and the district attorney shall use it only for the prosecution of persons who have fraudulently obtained medical assistance under this title, and shall not use the information, or disclose it, for any other purpose.

Whenever the state department, or a district attorney for the state department, or the state department on behalf of a county department, recovers any amount of fraudulently obtained medical assistance funds, the federal government shall be entitled to a share proportionate to the amount of federal funds paid unless a different amount is otherwise provided by federal law, the state shall be entitled to a share proportionate to the amount of state funds paid and such additional amounts of federal funds recovered as provided by federal law, and the county department shall be entitled to a share proportionate to the amount of county funds paid unless a different amount is provided pursuant to federal law or this section.

Whenever a county department, a county board, a district attorney, or a state department on behalf of a county department recovers any amount of fraudulently obtained public assistance funds in the form of assistance payments, it shall be deposited in the county social services fund, and the federal government is entitled to a share proportionate to the amount of federal funds paid, unless a different amount is provided for by federal law, the state is entitled to a share proportionate to one-half the amount of state funds paid, and the county is entitled to a share proportionate to the amount of county funds paid and, in addition, a share proportionate to one-half the amount of state funds paid.

Whenever a county department, a county board, a district attorney, or a state department on behalf of a county department recovers any amount of fraudulently obtained medical assistance, it shall be deposited in the county social services fund, and the federal government is entitled to a share proportionate to the amount of federal funds paid, unless a different amount is provided for by federal law, and the county is entitled to the remaining funds.

Whenever a county department, a county board, a district attorney, or the state department on behalf of the county recovers any amount of medical assistance payments that were obtained through unintentional client error, the federal government shall be entitled to a share proportionate to the amount of federal funds paid, unless a different amount is provided for by federal law, the state shall be entitled to a share proportionate to seventy-five percent of the amount of state funds paid, the county shall be entitled to a share proportionate to the amount of county funds paid, if any, and, in addition, a share proportionate to twenty-five percent of the amount of state funds paid.

Actual costs and expenses incurred by the district attorney's office in carrying out the provisions of subsection (2) of this section shall be billed to counties or a county within the judicial district in the proportions specified in section 20-1-302, C.R.S. Each county shall make an annual accounting to the state department on all amounts recovered.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire part amended, p. 1788, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2012:

(2)(b)(II) amended, (SB 12-060), ch. 166, p. 578, § 3, effective August 8.

Editor's note:

This section was contained in a 2006 act that amended this part, resulting in the addition of this section.

25.5-1-115.5. Medical assistance fraud - report.

Notwithstanding the provisions of section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), on or before November 1, 2017, and on or before November 1 each year thereafter, the state department shall submit a written report to the joint budget committee; the judiciary committee and the public health care and human services committee of the house of representatives, or their successor committees; and to the judiciary committee and the health and human services committee of the senate, or their successor committees, concerning fraud in the medicaid program. The state department shall compile a single, comprehensive report that includes the information described in this subsection (1), as well as information that the attorney general provides to the state department pursuant to section 25.5-4-303.3. The state department shall report to the general assembly concerning the fraudulent receipt of medicaid benefits, including, at a minimum:

Investigations of client fraud during the year;

Termination of client medicaid benefits due to fraud;

District attorney action, including, at a minimum, criminal complaints requested, cases dismissed, cases acquitted, convictions, and confessions of judgment;

Recoveries, including fines and penalties, restitution ordered, and restitution collected;

Trends in methods used to commit client fraud, excluding law enforcement-sensitive information; and

An estimate of the total savings, total cost, and net cost-effectiveness of fraud detection and recovery efforts.

Source:

L. 2012:

Entire section added, (SB 12-060), ch. 166, p. 577, § 1, effective August 8.

L. 2017:

IP(1) amended, (HB 17-1060), ch. 6, p. 14, § 2, effective March 1; IP(1), (1)(d), and (1)(e) amended and (1)(f) added, (SB 17-295), ch. 298, p. 1636, § 1, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

Amendments to the introductory portion of subsection (1) by HB 17-1060 and SB 17-295 were harmonized.